Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 5. Administrative Hearing Procedure to Enforce Rules and Regulations of Board of Agricultural Aviation
[Repealed].

§§ 69-21-151 through 69-21-165.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2002, ch. 301, § 19, eff from and after January 31, 2002.

§69-21-151. [Laws, 1990, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.]

§69-21-153. [Laws, 1990, ch. 392, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 468, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

§69-21-155. [Laws, 1990, ch. 392, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 468, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

§69-21-157. [Laws, 1990, ch. 392, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 468, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

§69-21-159. [Laws, 1990, ch. 392, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1990.]

§69-21-161. [Laws, 1990, ch. 392, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1990.]

§69-21-163. [Laws, 1990, ch. 392, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1990.]

§69-21-165. [Laws, 1990, ch. 392, § 8; Laws, 1997, ch. 468, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]